en: melon seed
de: Melonenkerne, Melonensamen
fi: meloninsiemen
fr: graines de melon
hr: sjeme dinje
it: semi di melone
sv: melonfrön

en: pumpkin seed, seeds of squash
ar: لب
be: насенне гарбуза
bg: тиквено семе, тиквени семена
ca: llavor de carbassa, llavors de carbassa
da: græskarkerne, græskarkerner
de: Kürbiskern, Kürbiskerne
el: πασατέμπος
es: semillas de calabaza
eu: kuia-pipita
fi: kurpitsansiemen, kurpitsansiemenet
fr: graine de courge, graines de courge, graines de potiron, graines de citrouille
hr: bučine koštice, bučine sjemenke, sjemenke buče, bučine golice, sjemenke bundeve, Koštice bundeve
hu: tökmag
it: semi di zucca
ja: かぼちゃの種
jv: wiji waluh
ko: 호박씨
la: Cucurbitae semen
ln: mbíka
nl: pompoenpitten
pl: nasiona dyni, ziarna dyni, pestki dyni
pt: sementes de abóbora
ro: seminţe de dovleac
ru: семя тыквы
sl: bučna semena
sv: pumpafrö, pumpafrön, pumpakärnor
ta: பூசணி விதை
tr: kabak çekirdeği
tt: кабак төше
uk: насіння гарбуза
vi: hạt bí
zh: 南瓜籽, 南瓜子

en: pumpkin seed flour
de: Kürbiskernmehl
es: harina de semillas de calabaza
hr: brašno od sjemenki bundeve
it: farina di semi di zucca

en: organic pumpkin seed
da: økologisk græskarkerne, økologiske græskarkerner
fi: luomu kurpitsansiemen
sv: ekologisk pumpafrö, ekologiska pumpafrön

en: poppy
de: Mohn
el: παπαρούνας
es: amapola
fr: pavot
hr: mak
it: papavero
la: Papaver somniferum
lt: aguonos
pl: mak, makowy, makowa, makowe, maku
pt: papoila
sv: vallmo

en: poppyseed, poppy seed, poppy seeds
af: Papawersaad
ar: بذور خشخاش
bg: маково семе, макови семена
ca: rosella, Llavors de rosella
da: birkes
de: Mohnsamen, Mohnsaat
el: σπόροι παπαρούνας
es: semillas de amapola
fi: unikonsiemen, unikonsiemenet
fr: graines de pavot
hr: makovnjača
is: Valmúafræ
it: semi di papavero, grani di papavero
ja: ケシの実
jv: Wiji poppy
ko: 양귀비 씨
ml: കശകശ
mr: खस खस
nb: valmuefrø
nl: maanzaad
pa: ਖਸਖਸ
pl: nasiona maku
pt: sementes de papoila
sa: तिलभेदः
sv: vallmofrö, vallmofrön
tr: Haşhaş tohumu
zh: 罌粟籽

en: blue poppy seed
de: Blaumohnsamen
fr: graine de pavot bleu, graines de pavot bleu
hr: plavi mak
it: semi di papavero blu

en: sesame
af: Sesam
am: ሰሊጥ
ar: سمسم
as: তিল
be: Кунжут
bg: сусам
bn: তিল
br: sezam
bs: Susam
ca: sèsam
cs: sezam, sezamová
cy: Sesame
da: sesam
de: Sesam
dv: ތިލެޔޮކޯޅި
el: σουσάμι, σησαμο
es: sésamo, ajonjolí
eu: Sesamo
fa: کنجد
fi: seesami
fr: sésame
ga: Seasaman
gl: Sésamo
gu: તલ
ha: Riɗi
he: שומשום
hi: तिल
hr: sezam, sezama, sezamova
ht: Wowoli
hu: szezám
hy: քունջութ
id: wijen
io: Sezamo
is: Sesam
it: sesamo
ja: ゴマ, ごま, 胡麻
jv: Wijèn
kk: Күнжіт
kn: ಎಳ್ಳು
ko: 참깨
ku: Kuncî
ky: Кунжут
ln: Wangila
lt: sezamo, sezamas
lv: sezams, sezama
mk: Сусам
ml: എള്ള്
mr: तीळ
ms: Bijan
mt: ġulġlien
my: နှမ်း
nb: sesam
nl: sesam
nn: sesam
oc: Sesam
or: ରାଶି
pa: ਤਿਲ
pl: Sezam, sezamu, sezamowy, sezamków, sezamowe, sezamowa
pt: sésam, sésamo
ro: Susan
ru: сезам, кунжут
sa: तिलः
sd: تر
sh: Sezam
si: තල
sl: sezamovo
sr: Сусам
su: Wijén
sv: sesam
sw: sesam
ta: எள்
te: నువ్వులు
th: งา
tl: Linga
tr: susam
uk: Кунжут
ur: سمسم
uz: Kunjut
vi: Vừng
za: Lwgraz
zh: 芝麻

en: white sesame
bg: бял сусам
de: weißer Sesam
fr: sésame blanc
hr: bijeli sezam
it: sesamo bianco
ja: 白ごま

en: black sesame
bg: черен сусам
de: schwarzer Sesam
fr: sésame noir
it: sesamo nero
ja: 黒ごま

en: sesame seeds
bg: сусамово семе, сусамови семена
ca: llavors de sèsam, grans de sèsam
cs: sezamová semena
da: sesamfrø
de: Sesamsamen, Sesamkörner, Sesamkorn, Sesamsaat, Sesamsaaten
el: σπόροι σησαμιού
es: granos de sésamo, semillas de sésamo, granos de ajonjolí, semillas de ajonjolí
et: seesamiseemned
fi: seesaminsiemen, seesaminsiemenet, seesaminsiemeniä
fr: graine de sésame, graines de sésame
ga: síolta seasamain
hr: sjemenke sezama, sjeme sezama
hu: szezámmag
it: semi di sesamo, grani di sesamo
lt: sezamo sėklos
lv: sezama sēklas
nb: sesamfrø
nl: sesamzaad, sesam zaden, sesamzaden, sesamzaadjes
pl: nasiona sezamu, ziarno sezamu, ziarna sezamu
pt: sementes de sésamo, sementes de sésam
ro: semințe de susan, seminte de susan
sk: sezamové semeno
sl: sezamovo seme
sv: sesamfrön, sesamfrö

en: white sesame seeds
fr: graine de sésame blanc, graines de sésame blanc
hr: bijelo sezamovo sjeme
it: semi di sesamo bianchi
pl: sezam biały, biały sezam

en: husked sesame seed
fr: graine de sésame décortiquée
hr: oljušteni sezam
it: semi di sesamo decorticati
pl: sezam łuszczony, sezamu łuszczonego

en: Husked and grilled sesame seed
fr: graine de sésame grilée et décortiquée
hr: oljušten i pečen sezam
it: semi di sesamo decorticati e tostati
pl: prażone ziarno sezamu

en: organic sesame seeds
de: biologische Sesamsamen
es: granos de sésamo orgánico
fi: luomu seesaminsiemenet
fr: graines de sesame bio
hr: organske sjemenke sezama
it: semi du sesamo bio
nl: biologisch sesamzaad

en: sesame paste, sesame seed paste
bg: паста от сусам
de: Sesampaste, Sesammus
es: pasta de sésamo
fi: seesamitahna, sesamtahna
fr: pâte de sésame, pâte de graines de sésame
hr: pasta od sezama
it: pasta di sesamo, crema di sesamo
ja: 胡麻ペスト
nl: sesampasta
pl: pasta sezamowa
ro: pastă de susan, pastă de seminte de susan
sv: sesampasta, sesam-kräm, sesam pasta

en: tahini, tahini paste, sesame tahini, sesame butter, sesame seed butter
xx: tahini, tahina
ar: طحينة
be: Тахіні
bg: Тахан, сусамов тахан
ca: tahina
cs: tahina
de: Tahina, Tahin
el: Ταχίνι
eo: Sezama pasto
es: tahini, tahin
et: tahhiini, tahiini
fa: ارده
fr: crème de sésame, tahin, tahiné
he: טחינה
hi: ताहिनी
hy: Թահին
it: Tahina, pasta di semi di sesamo
ja: 芝麻醤
ko: 참깨 소스
nl: tahin
pa: ਤਾਹੀਨੀ
pl: tahini, pasta sezamowa tahina, pasta sezamowa tahini
pt: tahine
ro: tahină
ru: тахини
th: ทาฮีนี
tr: Tahin
uk: Тахіні

en: sunflower seed, sunflower seeds, sunflower kernels
af: Sonneblomsaad
ar: حب الشمس
be: насенне сланечніка
bg: слънчогледово семе, Слънчогледови семки, слънчогледови семена
bn: সূর্যমুখী বীজ
bs: sjemenke od suncokreta
ca: llavors de gira-sol, pipes de gira-sol
cs: slunecnicová seminka, slunečnicová semínka
cv: Хĕвелчамăш
da: Solsikkekerner, solsikkefrø
de: Sonnenblumenkerne
el: ηλιόσπορος
eo: sunflora semo
es: semillas de girasol, pipas de girasol
et: päevalilleseemned
fa: تخمه آفتاب‌گردان
fi: auringonkukansiemen, auringonkukansiemenet, auringonkukansiemeniä
fr: graines de tournesol
gl: semente de xirasol
he: גרעיני חמנייה, גרעין חמנייה, גרעיני חמניה, גרעיני חמניה, גרעיני חמניות
hi: सूरजमुखी के बीज
hr: sjemenke od suncokreta, sjemenke suncokret, sjemenke suncokreta
hu: napraforgómag
hy: արևածաղկի սերմեր
id: Biji bunga matahari
it: semi di girasole
ja: ひまわりの種, 向日葵の種
jv: Wiji kembang srengéngé
ka: Күнбағыс дәні
ko: 해바라기 씨
lt: saulėgražų branduoliai
lv: saulespuķu sēklas
ml: സൂര്യകാന്തി വിത്ത്
ms: Biji bunga matahari
nb: solsikkefrø, solsikkekjerner
nl: zonnebloempitten, zonnebloempit
nn: solsikkefrø
or: ସୁର୍ଯ୍ୟମୂଖୀ ମଞ୍ଜି
pa: ਸੂਰਜਮੁਖੀ ਦੇ ਬੀਜ
pl: nasiona słonecznika, ziarna słonecznika, pestki słonecznika, nasion słonecznika, ziaren słonecznika, ziarno słonecznika
pt: Semente de girassol
ro: semințe de floarea soarelui
ru: Семена Подсолнечника
sk: slnečnicové jadierka
sl: sončnicina Semena
sq: farë luledielli
sr: Jezgro suncokreta
sv: solrosfrön, solrosfrö, solroskärna, solroskärnor
ta: சூரியகாந்தி விதை
th: เมล็ดทานตะวัน
tr: ayçiçeği çekirdeği, ayçiçek çekirdeği
tt: көнбагыш орлыгы
uk: Соняшникове насіння
ur: ورج مکھی بیج
vi: Hạt hướng dương
zh: 葵花籽

en: sunflower seed paste
de: Sonnenblumenkernmus
hr: pasta od suncokretovih sjemenki
it: pasta di semi di girasole

en: pepper
ak: moko
bg: пипер
ca: pebre
cs: Pepř
da: peber
de: Pfeffer
ee: ableh
eo: pipro
es: pimienta
et: Pipar
fi: pippuri
fr: poivre, poivres
gl: Pementa
hr: papar, biber
ht: Pwav
hu: Bors
is: pipar
it: pepe
ja: 胡椒, こしょう, コショウ
lt: Pipirai
lv: pipari
ms: Lada
nb: Pepper
nl: peper
nn: Pepar
oc: Pebre
pl: pieprz, pieprzu
pt: pimenta
ro: piper
ru: Перец
sl: poper
sr: biber
sv: peppar
tr: biber
ur: کالی مرچ
uz: galampiri